Arkansas, session 2025, HB1149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly intends to encourage and protect the development
of sustainable cultivation of vegetables and fruits at all levels of
production, including without limitation on private residential property for
personal consumption or noncommercial sharing, as an important interest of
the state.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 2, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
2-1-103. Vegetable garden protection — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Prohibit" means an act or failure to act by the governing
body of a local government that prevents a property owner from using his or
her private residential property to cultivate a vegetable garden after
compliance with generally applicable local laws and zoning requirements; and
(2) "Vegetable garden" means a plot of ground or an elevated
soil bed on private residential property where vegetables, herbs, fruits,
flowers, pollinator plants, leafy greens, or other edible plants are
cultivated for personal consumption or noncommercial sharing.
*CRH058*
02-27-2025 09:53:57 CRH058

As Engrossed: H1/28/25 S2/27/25 HB1149
(b) A person may cultivate a vegetable garden for personal consumption
or noncommercial sharing on his or her own private residential property or on
the private residential property of another person with the permission of the
property owner in any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of
this state.
(c) A county, municipality, or other political subdivision of
this state shall not prohibit vegetable gardens on private residential
properties.

/s/Vaught


























02-27-2025 09:53:57 CRH058